apertium-nld-0.2.0/apertium-nld.nld.dix
<pardef n="afst/elen__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elend</l>     <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eel</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eelt</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eelt</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="st/elen#_af__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>eel</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eelt</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>alen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>al</l>        <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eel</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eelt</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eelt</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elen</l>      <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ele</l>       <r>elen<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="afstel/len__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/></r></p><par n="gerund"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lend</l>      <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fs"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="imp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>den</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>len<s n="vblex"/><s n="sep"/><s n="fm"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="afstelen">        <i>afst</i><par n="afst/elen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afstelen">        <p><l>st</l>        <r>afst</r></p><par n="st/elen#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>af</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="vrijstellen">     <i>vrijstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="vrijstellen">     <p><l>stel</l>      <r>vrijstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>af</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="onderstellen">    <i>onderstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="onderstellen">    <p><l>stel</l>      <r>onderstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>onder</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="aanbevelen">      <i>aanbev</i><par n="afst/elen__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aanbevelen">      <p><l>bev</l>       <r>aanbev</r></p><par n="st/elen#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>aan</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="aanstellen">      <i>aanstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aanstellen">      <p><l>stel</l>      <r>aanstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>aan</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="aanvullen">       <i>aanvul</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="aanvullen">       <p><l>vul</l>       <r>aanvul</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>aan</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="afrollen">        <i>afrol</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="afrollen">        <p><l>rol</l>       <r>afrol</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>af</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="bijstellen">      <i>bijstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="bijstellen">      <p><l>stel</l>      <r>bijstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>bij</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="blootstellen">    <i>blootstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="blootstellen">    <p><l>stel</l>      <r>blootstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>bloot</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="doorvertellen">   <i>doorvertel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="doorvertellen">   <p><l>vertel</l>    <r>doorvertel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>door</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="geruststellen">   <i>geruststel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="geruststellen">   <p><l>stel</l>      <r>geruststel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>gerust</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="instellen">       <i>instel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="instellen">       <p><l>stel</l>      <r>instel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="invullen">        <i>invul</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="invullen">        <p><l>vul</l>       <r>invul</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>in</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="opbellen">        <i>opbel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="opbellen">        <p><l>bel</l>       <r>opbel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="oprollen">        <i>oprol</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="oprollen">        <p><l>rol</l>       <r>oprol</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="opstellen">       <i>opstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="opstellen">       <p><l>stel</l>      <r>opstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="optellen">        <i>optel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="optellen">        <p><l>tel</l>       <r>optel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="optillen">        <i>optil</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="optillen">        <p><l>til</l>       <r>optil</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="opvullen">        <i>opvul</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="opvullen">        <p><l>vul</l>       <r>opvul</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>op</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="samenstellen">    <i>samenstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="samenstellen">    <p><l>stel</l>      <r>samenstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>samen</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="teleurstellen">   <i>teleurstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="terechtstellen">  <i>terechtstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="terechtstellen">  <p><l>stel</l>      <r>terechtstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>terecht</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="terugstellen">    <i>terugstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="terugstellen">    <p><l>stel</l>      <r>terugstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>terug</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="uitstellen">      <i>uitstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="uitstellen">      <p><l>stel</l>      <r>uitstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>uit</l><r></r></p></e>
<e lm="voorstellen">     <i>voorstel</i><par n="afstel/len__vblex_sep"/></e>
<e lm="voorstellen">     <p><l>stel</l>      <r>voorstel</r></p><par n="stel/len#_af__vblex_sep"/><p><l><b/>voor</l><r></r></p></e>
